Ohio, session 136, HB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3321.044 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3321.044. (A) A school district shall consider a student in any of grades kindergarten through twelve present at school during school hours when the student is participating in scheduled school-sponsored or workforce preparation activities approved by the district. Approved activities shall include 4-H and FFA activities or programs, athletic tournaments, field trips, internships, shadowing opportunities, and any other activity approved by the district. A school district may require an educator affiliated with the activity or the student's parent to submit written documentation, including the hours of participation, to a school principal or attendance officer as proof of participation in the approved activity. The district shall give the student the opportunity to make up any school work missed during the student's participation in an approved activity under this section. Class grades for the student and the chronic absenteeism calculation for the district or school shall not be adversely affected by the student's participation in an approved activity under this section. (B) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, a school principal or a designee of the school principal shall consider a student absent under this section if the student's participation in an activity occurs during either of the following: (1) A scheduled administration of state assessments; (2) Any period of time for which the student has been disciplined, suspended, or expelled, if the terms of such punishment would preclude the student from otherwise participating in an educational field trip or extracurricular activity.